src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON ыPlStem_anim_ей      !Inanimate
ыPlNomStem_anim ;
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ей # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Gen:%>ей # ;
PlPeriphStem_anim ;

LEXICON ыPlStem_anim_ов      !Inanimate
ыPlNomStem_anim ;
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ов%^G # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Gen:%>ов%^G # ;
PlPeriphStem_anim ;

LEXICON ыPlStem_anim_zero
ыPlNomStem_anim ;
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:%> # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Gen:%> # ;
PlObliqStem_anim ;

LEXICON ыPlStem_anim_ь
ыPlNomStem_anim ;
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ь # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Gen:%>ь # ;
PlObliqStem_anim ;

LEXICON ыPlEnd_anim
ыPlNomEnd_anim ;
PlAccEnd_anim ;
PlObliqEnd_anim ;

LEXICON ыPlEnd_anim_Prb
ыPlNomEnd_anim_Prb ;
PlAccEnd_anim_Prb ;
PlObliqEnd_anim_Prb ;

LEXICON ыPlEnd_anim_gPrb
ыPlNomEnd_anim ;
! +Anim+Pl+Acc+Prb:%>о́в # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Gen+Prb:%>о́в # ;
PlPeriphEnd_anim ;

LEXICON ыPlEnd_anim_ов
ыPlNomEnd_anim ;
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:%>о́в%^G # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Gen:%>о́в%^G # ;
PlPeriphEnd_anim ;

LEXICON ыPlEnd_anim_ов_Prb
ыPlNomEnd_anim_Prb ;
! +Anim+Pl+Acc+Prb:%>о́в%^G # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Gen+Prb:%>о́в%^G # ;
PlPeriphEnd_anim_Prb ;

LEXICON ыPlEnd_anim_zero
ыPlNomEnd_anim ;
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:%> # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Gen:%> # ;
PlPeriphEnd_anim ;

LEXICON ыPlEnd_anim_й
ыPlNomEnd_anim ;
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:%>й # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Gen:%>й # ;
PlPeriphEnd_anim ;

LEXICON ыPlAnom_anim
ыPlNomStem_anim ;
PlAccEnd_anim ;
PlObliqEnd_anim ;

LEXICON аPlStem_anim
аPlNomStem_anim ;
PlAccStem_anim ;
PlObliqStem_anim ;

LEXICON аPlStem_anim_Prb
аPlNomStem_anim_Prb ;
PlAccStem_anim_Prb ;
PlObliqStem_anim_Prb ;

LEXICON аPlStem_anim_ов
аPlNomStem_anim ;
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:%>о́в%^G # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Gen:%>о́в%^G # ;
PlPeriphStem_anim ;

LEXICON аPlStem_anim_zero
аPlNomStem_anim ;
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:%> # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Gen:%> # ;
PlPeriphStem_anim ;

LEXICON аPlEnd_anim
аPlNomEnd_anim ;
PlAccEnd_anim ;
PlObliqEnd_anim ;

! LEXICON ыPlNomStem
! +Inan+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;

! LEXICON ыPlNomStem_Fac
! +Inan+Pl+Nom+Fac:%>ы # ;

! LEXICON ыPlNomStem_Prb
! +Inan+Pl+Nom+Prb:%>ы # ;

! LEXICON ыPlNomStem_anim
! +Anim+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;

! LEXICON ыPlNomStem_anim_Fac
! +Anim+Pl+Nom+Fac:%>ы # ;

! LEXICON ыPlNomStem_anim_Prb
! +Anim+Pl+Nom+Prb:%>ы # ;

! LEXICON ыPlNomStem_anim_Use/Obs
! +Anim+Pl+Nom+Use/Obs:%>ы # ;

! LEXICON ыPlNomStem_anim_Elid
! +Anim+Pl+Nom+Elid:%>ы # ;

! LEXICON ыPlNomEnd
! +Inan+Pl+Nom:%>ы́ # ;

! LEXICON ыPlNomEnd_Prb
! +Inan+Pl+Nom+Prb:%>ы́ # ;

! LEXICON ыPlNomEnd_anim
! +Anim+Pl+Nom:%>ы́ # ;

! LEXICON ыPlNomEnd_anim_Prb
! +Anim+Pl+Nom+Prb:%>ы́ # ;

! LEXICON ыPlAccStem
! +Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;

! LEXICON ыPlAccStem_Fac
! +Inan+Pl+Acc+Fac:%>ы # ;

! LEXICON ыPlAccStem_Prb
! +Inan+Pl+Acc+Prb:%>ы # ;

! LEXICON ыPlAccEnd
! +Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́ # ;

! LEXICON ыPlAccEnd_Prb
! +Inan+Pl+Acc+Prb:%>ы́ # ;

! LEXICON PlAccStem_anim
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ов # ;

! LEXICON PlAccStem_anim_Fac
! +Anim+Pl+Acc+Fac:%>ов # ;

! LEXICON PlAccStem_anim_Prb
! +Anim+Pl+Acc+Prb:%>ов # ;

! LEXICON PlAccStem_anim_Use/Obs
! +Anim+Pl+Acc+Use/Obs:%>ов # ;

! LEXICON PlAccStem_anim_Elid
! +Anim+Pl+Acc+Elid:%>ов # ;

! LEXICON PlAccEnd_anim
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:%>о́в # ;

! LEXICON PlAccEnd_anim_Prb
! +Anim+Pl+Acc+Prb:%>о́в # ;

! LEXICON аPlNomStem
! +Inan+Pl+Nom:%>а # ;

! LEXICON аPlNomStem_Prb
! +Inan+Pl+Nom+Prb:%>а # ;

! LEXICON аPlNomStem_anim
! +Anim+Pl+Nom:%>а # ;

! LEXICON аPlNomStem_anim_Prb
! +Anim+Pl+Nom+Prb:%>а # ;

! LEXICON аPlNomEnd
! +Inan+Pl+Nom:%>а́ # ;

! LEXICON аPlNomEnd_Prb
! +Inan+Pl+Nom+Prb:%>а́ # ;

! LEXICON аPlNomEnd_anim
! +Anim+Pl+Nom:%>а́ # ;

! LEXICON аPlNomEnd_anim_Prb
! +Anim+Pl+Nom+Prb:%>а́ # ;

! LEXICON аPlAccStem
! +Inan+Pl+Acc:%>а # ;

! LEXICON аPlAccStem_Prb
! +Inan+Pl+Acc+Prb:%>а # ;

! LEXICON аPlAccEnd
! +Inan+Pl+Acc:%>а́ # ;

! LEXICON аPlAccEnd_Prb
! +Inan+Pl+Acc+Prb:%>а́ # ;

LEXICON PlObliqStem
! +Inan+Pl+Gen:%>ов # ;
PlPeriphStem ;

LEXICON PlObliqStem_Fac
! +Inan+Pl+Gen+Fac:%>ов # ;
PlPeriphStem_Fac ;

LEXICON PlObliqStem_Prb
! +Inan+Pl+Gen+Prb:%>ов # ;
PlPeriphStem_Prb ;

LEXICON PlObliqStem_anim
! +Anim+Pl+Gen:%>ов # ;
PlPeriphStem_anim ;

LEXICON PlObliqStem_anim_Fac
! +Anim+Pl+Gen+Fac:%>ов # ;
PlPeriphStem_anim_Fac ;

LEXICON PlObliqStem_anim_Prb
! +Anim+Pl+Gen+Prb:%>ов # ;
PlPeriphStem_anim_Prb ;

LEXICON PlObliqStem_anim_Use/Obs
! +Anim+Pl+Gen+Use/Obs:%>ов # ;
PlPeriphStem_anim_Use/Obs ;

LEXICON PlObliqStem_anim_Elid
! +Anim+Pl+Gen+Elid:%>ов # ;
PlPeriphStem_anim_Elid ;

! LEXICON PlPeriphStem
! +Inan+Pl+Loc:%>ах # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Dat:%>ам # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Ins:%>ами # ;

! LEXICON PlPeriphStem_Fac
! +Inan+Pl+Loc+Fac:%>ах # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Dat+Fac:%>ам # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Ins+Fac:%>ами # ;

! LEXICON PlPeriphStem_Prb
! +Inan+Pl+Loc+Prb:%>ах # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Dat+Prb:%>ам # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Ins+Prb:%>ами # ;

! LEXICON PlPeriphStem_anim
! +Anim+Pl+Loc:%>ах # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Dat:%>ам # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Ins:%>ами # ;

! LEXICON PlPeriphStem_anim_Fac
! +Anim+Pl+Loc+Fac:%>ах # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Dat+Fac:%>ам # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Ins+Fac:%>ами # ;

! LEXICON PlPeriphStem_anim_Prb
! +Anim+Pl+Loc+Prb:%>ах # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Dat+Prb:%>ам # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Ins+Prb:%>ами # ;

! LEXICON PlPeriphStem_anim_Use/Obs
! +Anim+Pl+Loc+Use/Obs:%>ах # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Dat+Use/Obs:%>ам # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Ins+Use/Obs:%>ами # ;

! LEXICON PlPeriphStem_anim_Elid
! +Anim+Pl+Loc+Elid:%>ах # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Dat+Elid:%>ам # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Ins+Elid:%>ами # ;

LEXICON PlObliqEnd
! +Inan+Pl+Gen:%>о́в # ;
PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON PlObliqEnd_Prb
! +Inan+Pl+Gen+Prb:%>о́в # ;
PlPeriphEnd_Prb ;

LEXICON PlObliqEnd_anim
! +Anim+Pl+Gen:%>о́в # ;
PlPeriphEnd_anim ;

LEXICON PlObliqEnd_anim_Prb
! +Anim+Pl+Gen+Prb:%>о́в # ;
PlPeriphEnd_anim_Prb ;

! LEXICON PlPeriphEnd
! +Inan+Pl+Loc:%>а́х # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Dat:%>а́м # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Ins:%>а́ми # ;

! LEXICON PlPeriphEnd_Prb
! +Inan+Pl+Loc+Prb:%>а́х # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Dat+Prb:%>а́м # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Ins+Prb:%>а́ми # ;

! LEXICON PlPeriphEnd_anim
! +Anim+Pl+Loc:%>а́х # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Dat:%>а́м # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Ins:%>а́ми # ;

! LEXICON PlPeriphEnd_anim_Prb
! +Anim+Pl+Loc+Prb:%>а́х # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Dat+Prb:%>а́м # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Ins+Prb:%>а́ми # ;

LEXICON Pl_ин_anim
! +Anim+Pl+Nom:е # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Acc: # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Gen: # ;
PlPeriphEnd_anim ;

LEXICON пол-NomAccOnly_Msc ! see Zaliznjak §1 (pg 73)
+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;

LEXICON пол-NomAccOnly_Neu ! see Zaliznjak §1 (pg 73)
+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;

LEXICON пол-NomAccOnly_Fem ! see Zaliznjak §1 (pg 73)
+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;

LEXICON пол-м_a
+N+Msc: MSgObliqStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON пол-м_b
+N+Msc: MSgObliqEnd ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd ;

LEXICON пол-м_c
+N+Msc: MSgObliqStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd ;

LEXICON пол-м_c1
+N+Msc: MSgObliqStem ;
+N+Msc: аPlEnd ;

LEXICON пол-м_e
+N+Msc: MSgObliqStem ;
+N+Msc: ыPlAnom ;

LEXICON пол-с_b12
+N+Neu: MSgObliqEnd ;
+N+Neu: ыPlEnd_ов ;

LEXICON пол-с_d
+N+Neu: MSgObliqEnd ;
+N+Neu: аPlStem ;

LEXICON пол-ж_a
+N+Fem: FSgObliqStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON пол-ж_d
+N+Fem: FSgObliqEnd ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON полкилометра
! пол+Num+Nom#километр+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen:по̀лкиломе́тра # ;
! ! пол+Num+Acc#километр+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen:по̀лкиломе́тра # ;
полкилометра:полукиломе́тр пол-м_a ;

LEXICON пол-литра
! пол+Num+Nom#литр+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen:по̀л-ли́тра # ;
! ! пол+Num+Acc#литр+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen:по̀л-ли́тра # ;
пол-литра:полули́тр пол-м_a ;

LEXICON полметра
! пол+Num+Nom#метр+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen:по̀лме́тра # ;
! ! пол+Num+Acc#метр+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen:по̀лме́тра # ;
полметра:полуме́тр пол-м_a ;

LEXICON полмиллиона
! пол+Num+Nom#миллион+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen:по̀лмиллио́на # ;
! ! пол+Num+Acc#миллион+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen:по̀лмиллио́на # ;
полмиллиона:полумиллио́н пол-м_a ;

LEXICON полфунта
! пол+Num+Nom#фунт+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen:по̀лфу́нта # ;
! ! пол+Num+Acc#фунт+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen:по̀лфу́нта # ;
полфунта:полуфу́нт пол-м_a ;

LEXICON пол-листа
! пол+Num+Nom#лист+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen:по̀л-листа́ # ;
! ! пол+Num+Acc#лист+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen:по̀л-листа́ # ;
пол-листа:полули́ст пол-м_b ;

LEXICON полчаса
! пол+Num+Nom#час+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen+Count:по̀лчаса́ # ;
! ! пол+Num+Acc#час+N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen+Count:по̀лчаса́ # ;
полчаса:получа́с пол-м_c ;
